Arkansas, session 2025, HB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Direct Democracy Act
of 2025".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-126(e) and (f), concerning the count of
signatures for initiative petitions or referendum petitions, are repealed.
(e) In order to certify a measure for the statewide election ballot,
the official charged with verifying the signatures on an initiative petition
or referendum petition shall also verify:
(1) For a statutory initiative petition or referendum petition,
*SSS015*
01-23-2025 09:52:38 SSS015

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1042
that:
(A) Petitions are filed from at least fifty (50) counties
of the state; and
(B) The petitions bear the signature of at least one-half
(½) of the designated percentage of the electors of each county represented
in subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section; and
(2) For an initiative petition for a constitutional amendment,
that:
(A) Petitions are filed from at least fifty (50) counties
of the state; and
(B) The petitions bear the signature of at least one-half
(½) of the designated percentage of the electors of each county represented
in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section.
(f) If the requirements of subsection (e) of this section are less
than the designated number of signatures or counties represented by petitions
required by the Arkansas Constitution and statutory law in order to certify
the measure for the ballot and the deadline for filing petitions has passed,
the official charged with verifying the signatures shall declare the petition
insufficient and shall not accept and file any additional signatures to cure
the insufficiency of the petition on its face.

/s/A. Collins














01-23-2025 09:52:38 SSS015